Washington statutes.
RCW 19.154.060

Prohibited practices—Assistance with immigration matters.

(1) Persons, other than those licensed to practice law in this state or otherwise permitted to practice law or represent others under federal law in an immigration matter, are prohibited from engaging in the practice of law in an immigration matter for compensation.

(2) Persons, other than those licensed to practice law in this state or otherwise permitted to practice law or represent others under federal law in an immigration matter, are prohibited from engaging in the following acts or practices, for compensation:

(a) Advising or assisting another person in determining the person's legal or illegal status for the purpose of an immigration matter;

(b) Selecting or assisting another in selecting, or advising another as to his or her answers on, a government agency form or document in an immigration matter;

(c) Selecting or assisting another in selecting, or advising another in selecting, a benefit, visa, or program to apply for in an immigration matter;

(d) Soliciting to prepare documents for, or otherwise representing the interests of, another in a judicial or administrative proceeding in an immigration matter;

(e) Explaining, advising, or otherwise interpreting the meaning or intent of a question on a government agency form in an immigration matter;

(f) Charging a fee for referring another to a person licensed to practice law;

(g) Selecting, drafting, or completing legal documents affecting the legal rights of another in an immigration matter.

(3) Persons, other than those holding an active license to practice law issued by the Washington state bar association or otherwise permitted to practice law or represent others under federal law in an immigration matter, are prohibited from engaging in the following acts or practices, regardless of whether compensation is sought:

(a) Representing, either orally or in any document, letterhead, advertisement, stationery, business card, website, or other comparable written material, that he or she is a notario publico, notario, immigration assistant, immigration consultant, immigration specialist, or using any other designation or title, in any language, that conveys or implies that he or she possesses professional legal skills in the area of immigration law;

(b) Representing, in any language, either orally or in any document, letterhead, advertisement, stationery, business card, website, or other comparable written material, that he or she can or is willing to provide services in an immigration matter, if such services would constitute the practice of law.

(4)(a) The prohibitions of subsections (1) through (3) of this section shall not apply to the activities of nonlawyer assistants acting under the supervision of a person holding an active license to practice law issued by the Washington state bar association or otherwise permitted to practice law or represent others under federal law in an immigration matter.

(b) This section does not prohibit a person from offering translation services, regardless of whether compensation is sought. Translating words contained on a government form from English to another language and translating a person's words from another language to English does not constitute the unauthorized practice of law.

(5) In addition to complying with the prohibitions of subsections (1) through (3) of this section, persons licensed as a notary public under chapter 42.45 RCW who do not hold an active license to practice law issued by the Washington state bar association shall not use the term notario publico, notario, immigration assistant, immigration consultant, immigration specialist, or any other designation or title, in any language, that conveys or implies that he or she possesses professional legal skills in the areas of immigration law, when advertising notary public services in the conduct of their business. A violation of any provision of this chapter by a person licensed as a notary public under chapter 42.45 RCW shall constitute unprofessional conduct under the uniform regulation of business and professions act, chapter 18.235 RCW.

[ 2017 c 281 s 39; 2011 c 244 s 3; 1989 c 117 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 c 281: See RCW 42.45.905.

Effective date—2011 c 244: See note following RCW 19.154.010.